Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8407
Sections; applicability.

Sections 71-8401 to 71-8407 do not apply to the release of medical records under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.

Laws 1999, LB 17, § 7.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.